Florida, session 2026, HB1501.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (16) of section 1001.42, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
1001.42 Powers and duties of district school board.—The
district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all
powers and perform all duties listed below:
(16) SCHOOL LUNCH PROGRAM.—
(a) Assume such responsibilities and exercise such powers
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1501 2026
and perform such duties as may be assigned to it by law or as
may be required by rules of the Department of Agriculture and
Consumer Services or, as in the opinion of the district school
board, are necessary to ensure school lunch services, consistent
with needs of students; effective and efficient operation of the
program; and the proper articulation of the school lunch program
with other phases of education in the district.
(b) Each school district shall require each school within
the district to participate in the National School Lunch Program
and the School Breakfast Program. Each school shall make:
1. Lunch available pursuant to the National School Lunch
Program, regardless of whether such student has the money to pay
for the lunch or owes money for meals previously provided. A
school district may collect payment for meals provided pursuant
to this paragraph. However, a school district may not use a
third-party debt collector to collect such debt.
2. Breakfast available pursuant to the National School
Breakfast Program at no cost to the student unless the student's
parent has provided written notification to the school to
withhold such meal from the student. The Department of
Agriculture and Consumer Services shall reimburse each school
district for each school breakfast served to a student, with a
maximum of one breakfast per student per school day. The
reimbursement rate shall be the difference between the amount
paid by the United States Department of Agriculture and the free
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1501 2026
rate set annually by the United States Secretary of Agriculture
for each school.
(c) The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services
may adopt rules to administer this subsection.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1501-00